North Carolina, session 2025, HB900.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 120-135 reads as rewritten:
"§ 120-135. Legislator is custodian of documents.
(a) Each legislator, while in office and after leaving office, shall be the custodian of all
documents, supporting documents, drafting requests, and information requests made or received
by that legislator while a legislator.
(b) A legislator, while in office or after leaving office, shall not be required to reveal or
to consent to reveal any document, supporting document, drafting request, or information request
made or received by that legislator while a legislator.legislator, except for with respect to the
following:
(1) Federal grand jury subpoenas.
(2) Requests for information from investigative authorities.
(3) Correspondence regarding bills appropriating State funds to businesses and
nonprofits.
(4) Correspondence with lobbyists and lobbyist principals regarding legislation.
(5) Compensation records of the legislator's staff.
(6) Correspondence with State agencies regarding business interests of the
legislator."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H900-v-1*